Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.100

Return of depositions.

When a commission shall have been duly executed, the commissioner shall annex thereto the depositions of the witnesses, duly certified by him or her, and shall, without delay, transmit the same by mail, inclosed [enclosed] and under seal, or deliver the same, to the chair of the committee by which the commission shall have been issued, or to such person as by the committee directed.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6009; 1895 c 6 s 9; RRS s 8186.]